District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Veteran Spouse Homestead Deduction Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-850(a-2) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “veteran” and inserting
the phrase “veteran or eligible spouse” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Veteran has been classified (or, in the case of an eligible spouse, had been
classified at the time of the veteran’s death) by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
as having a total and permanent disability as a result of a service-incurred condition or service-
aggravated condition or is paid (or, in the case of an eligible spouse, had been paid at the time of
the veteran’s death) at the 100% disability rating level as a result of unemployability; and”.
(3) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the word “Veteran’s” and inserting
the phrase “Veteran’s or eligible spouse’s” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “the veteran” both times it appears and insert the
phrase “the veteran or eligible spouse” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “the veteran’s legal guardian” and insert the phrase
“the veteran’s or eligible spouse’s legal guardian” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “this subsection.” and
inserting the phrase “this subsection. Upon the filing of an application by an eligible spouse
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the District of Columbia Office of Veterans
Affairs shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue that the deceased veteran met the disability
requirements for the deduction provided pursuant to this subsection at the time of the veteran’s
death.” in its place.
(c) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “eligible spouse” means
the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a deceased veteran whose real property was
validly receiving the deduction provided under this subsection at the time of the veteran’s
death or whose real property would have been eligible for such deduction at the time of the
veteran’s death had the veteran applied for such deduction.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
Sec 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3